Maine, session 132, LD1802.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §810, sub-§3, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 485, §1, is amended
to read:
A. There is a risk upon conviction that the accused may be sentenced to a term of
imprisonment;. For purposes of this paragraph, there is a risk upon conviction that the
accused may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment if:
(1) The prosecutor informs the court that the prosecutor will, if the accused is
convicted, request that the accused be sentenced to a term of imprisonment;
(2) The accused is in custody at the time of the initial appearance or arraignment;
(3) The accused is held in custody as a result of the criminal proceeding for more
than a total of 24 hours; or
(4) A court has found a risk upon conviction that the accused may be sentenced to
a term of imprisonment in any other currently pending criminal matter in which
the accused is a defendant;